North Dakota, session 69, SB2039.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 57-02-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
1. a. "Agricultural property" means platted or unplatted lands used for raising agricultural crops
or grazing farm animals, except as provided in this subsection. For platted lands:
(1) Lands platted and assessed as agricultural property prior to March 30, 1981, shall
continue to be assessed as agricultural property until put to a use other than raising
agricultural crops or grazing farm animals. Agricultural property includes land on
which a greenhouse or other building is located if the land is used for a nursery or
other purpose associated with the operation of the greenhouse. The time limitations
contained in this section may not be construed to prevent property that was
assessed as other than agricultural property from being assessed as agricultural
property if the property otherwise qualifies under this subsection.
a. (2) Property platted on or after March 30, 1981, is not agricultural property when any
four of the following conditions exist:
(1)(a) The land is platted by the owner.
(2)(b) Public improvements, including sewer, water, or streets, are in place.
(3)(c) Topsoil is removed or topography is disturbed to the extent that the property
cannot be used to raisegrow crops or graze farm animals.
(4)(d) Property is zoned other than agricultural.
(5)(e) Property has assumed an urban atmosphere because of adjacent residential
or commercial development on three or more sides.
(6)(f) The parcel is less than ten acres [4.05 hectares] and not contiguous to
agricultural property.
(7)(g) The property sells for more than four times the county average true and full
agricultural value.
b. For purposes of this subsection:
(1) "Raising agricultural crops" includes the storage of harvested crops produced by a
farmer or a direct relative of the farmer until the crop is delivered to the first
end - point user .
(2) The existence of any of the conditions in paragraph 2 of subdivision a may not be
used as a basis to exclude unplatted land used to raise agricultural crops or land

S. B. NO. 2039 - PAGE 2
platted and assessed as agricultural property prior to March 30, 1981, used to raise
agricultural crops from being classified as agricultural property.
(3) Land that was assessed as agricultural property at the time the land was put to use
for extraction of oil, natural gas, or subsurface minerals as defined in section 38-12-
01 must continue to be assessed as agricultural property if the remainder of the
surface owner's parcel of property on which the subsurface mineral activity is
occurring continues to qualify for assessment as agricultural property under this
subsection.
(4) Agricultural property includes land on which a greenhouse or other building is
located if the land is used for a nursery or other purpose associated with the
operation of the greenhouse.
(5) The time limitations contained in this subsection may not be construed to prevent
property that was assessed as other than agricultural property from being assessed
as agricultural property if the property otherwise qualifies under this subsection.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Subdivision a of subsection 15 of section 57-02-08 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
a. All farm structures and improvements located on agricultural lands.
(1) This subsection must be construed to exempt farm buildings and improvements
only, and may not be construed to exempt from taxation industrial plants, or
structures of any kind not used or intended for use as a part of a farm plant, or as a
farm residence.
(2) "Farm buildings and improvements" includes a greenhouse or other building used
primarily for the growing of horticultural or nursery products from seed, cuttings, or
roots, if not used on more than an occasional basis for a showroom for the retail
sale of horticultural or nursery products. A greenhouse or building used primarily for
display and sale of grown horticultural or nursery products is not a farm building or
improvement.
(3) (a) The following structures and improvements are not exempt under this
subsection:
[1] Any structure or improvement used primarily in connection with a retail or
wholesale business other than farming, any;
[2] Any structure or improvement located on platted land within the
corporate limits of a city, anyexcept a structure owned by a farmer, used
exclusively for storage of harvested crops produced by the farmer or a
direct relative of the farmer until the crop is delivered to the first
end - point user, and affixed to land platted and assessed as agricultura l
property prior to March 30, 1981 ;
[3] Any structure or improvement used by a manufacturing facility as defined
in section 19-24.1-01, or any; and
[4] Any structure or improvement located on railroad operating property
subject to assessment under chapter 57-05 is not exempt under this
subsection.
(b) For purposes of this paragraph, "business other than farming" includes
processing to produce a value-added physical or chemical change in an

S. B. NO. 2039 - PAGE 3
agricultural commodity beyond the ordinary handling of that commodity by a
farmer prior to sale.
(4) The following factors may not be considered in application of the exemption under
this subsection:
(a) Whether the farmer grows or purchases feed for animals raised on the farm.
(b) Whether animals being raised on the farm are owned by the farmer.
(c) Whether the farm's replacement animals are produced on the farm.
(d) Whether the farmer is engaged in contract feeding of animals on the farm.
SECTION 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act is effective for taxable years beginning after
December 31, 2025.

S. B. NO. 2039 - PAGE 4
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2039.
Senate Vote: Yeas 38 Nays 9 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 84 Nays 7 Absent 3
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State